Hawaii, session 2025, SB1174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that historic preservation will play a critical role in rebuilding Lahaina.  The department of land and natural resources state historic preservation division is tasked with evaluating and enforcing state and federal historic preservation law.  The department, however, does not have an internal historic archaeologist to implement mandates and to plan and manage projects on historic preservation. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys to the state historic preservation division of the department of land and natural resources for one temporary full‑time equivalent (1.0 FTE) archaeologist position for a five-year period. SECTION 2. The department of land and natural resources may employ one temporary full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) archaeologist position for five years. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) archaeologist position within the state historic preservation division of the department of land and natural resources. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________